Massachusetts, session 194th, S1308.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. The Legislature hereby amends Chapter 149 of the Massachusetts General
Laws by inserting after Section 203 the following:-
Section 204.
A. Definitions.
of 3

Employer. For the purposes of this section, an employer is any individual, corporation,
partnership, or other private or public entity, including any agent or officer having the
management of such entity, that is incorporated in, headquartered in, and/or operates in the
Commonwealth, including the Commonwealth itself, its instrumentalities, political subdivisions,
their instrumentalities, any instrumentality of more than one of the foregoing, and any
instrumentality of any of the foregoing and one or more other states or political subdivisions,
who engages the services of a Remote Employee, as defined in this section, for wages,
remuneration or other compensation, except the United States government and the government
of any other country shall not be considered an Employer.
Remote Employee. A remote employee is an individual who otherwise meets the
definition of “employee” in G.L. c. 149, § 148B(a), who is hired to perform any labor or provide
service for an Employer, as defined in this section, that includes reporting to and transmitting
work product to that Employer virtually (including but not limited to by telephone, video,
website, or internet application), and not by in-person means, regardless of where the work is
physically performed.
Additionally, where a work transmitted virtually is made for hire, as defined in Section
101 of Title 17 of the United States Code, and the ordering or commissioning Employer obtains
ownership of all the rights comprised in the copyright in the work, the individual drafting the
work for hire, in whole or in part, is included in this definition of Remote Employee.
B. Absent A Clear and Unmistakable Contractual Waiver, an affirmative choice of law of
another jurisdiction in Which the Employee Transmits Work Product for an Employer Virtually
or the Employer is Incorporated, and Affirmative Compliance with the Law of that Jurisdiction,
of 3

Massachusetts Law Shall Apply to Remote Employees Performing Work Virtually for the
Benefit of Employers Incorporated, Headquartered, or Operating in Massachusetts.
Unless clearly and unmistakably designated by a written, mutually executed contract
between the parties (which contract is not a contract of adhesion but is instead individually
negotiated between the parties) with a provision unequivocally establishing that the law of a
jurisdiction where (1)a Remote Employee transmits work product to the Employer virtually or
(2) the Employer is incorporated applies rather than the law of the Commonwealth and (3) the
contract expressly provides for compliance with all legal obligations imposed by the jurisdiction
relevant to the employment of the Remote Employee, the laws of the Commonwealth shall
regulate all terms and conditions of a Remote Employee’s on behalf of an Employer.
A contract designating the choice of law as a jurisdiction other than the Commonwealth
shall not be effective, however, upon a showing that the Employer has failed to comply with any
legal obligation imposed by the jurisdiction concerning the working terms or conditions of the
Remote Employee.
In such a case, the laws of this Commonwealth shall regulate the terms and conditions of
a Remote Employee.
SECTION 2. SECTION 1 shall be enacted January 1, 2026.
of 3